Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20138-167.01
Banks; publication requirements
not applicable; when.

The publication requirements of section
8-167 shall not apply to any bank that makes a disclosure statement available
to any member of the general public upon request in compliance with the disclosure
of financial information provisions of 12 C.F.R. part 350, as such part existed on January 1, 2013.

Laws 1995, LB 384, § 18;

Laws 2013, LB213, § 4.